Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-214
Transfer of the wholesaler's business, defined.

Transfer of the wholesaler's business shall mean the voluntary sale, assignment, or other transfer (1) of all or control of the wholesaler's business, (2) of all or substantially all of the assets of the wholesaler, or (3) of all or control of the capital stock of the wholesaler, including the sale or other transfer of capital stock or assets by merger, consolidation, or dissolution, or of the capital stock of the parent corporation, or of the capital stock or beneficial ownership of any other entity owning or controlling the wholesaler.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 14.